New York, session 2025-2026, A6371.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any rule or regulation by any local govern- 2 ment, the New York city water board is hereby prohibited from adopting 3 any rules or regulations that reduce the timeframe for consumers to 4 appeal bills or receive refunds or are otherwise less favorable to the 5 consumer and where backbilling errors are discovered in favor of the 6 consumer, the New York city water board shall provide for and order 7 refunds up to six years. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06046-01-5